Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 23A Circuit Court

23A.010.
Jurisdiction of Circuit Court — Court of record and of continuous session.

The Circuit Court is a court of general jurisdiction; it has original jurisdiction of all justiciable causes not exclusively vested in some other court.

The Circuit Court has appellate jurisdiction as specified in this chapter.

The Circuit Court is a court of record and of continuous session.

The Circuit Court may be authorized by law to review the actions or decisions of administrative agencies, special districts or boards. Such review shall not constitute an appeal but an original action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 475, effective January 2, 1978; 1996, ch. 40, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2003, ch. 66, § 13, effective June 24, 2003.

23A.020.
Judicial circuits. [Effective until January 2, 2023]

The state is divided into judicial circuits, each to be composed of the following counties:

First Judicial Circuit. Ballard, Carlisle, Fulton, and Hickman.

Second Judicial Circuit. McCracken.

Third Judicial Circuit. Christian.

Fourth Judicial Circuit. Hopkins.

Fifth Judicial Circuit. Crittenden, Union, and Webster.

Sixth Judicial Circuit. Davies.

Seventh Judicial Circuit. Logan and Todd.

Eighth Judicial Circuit. Warren.

Ninth Judicial Circuit. Hardin.

Tenth Judicial Circuit. Hart, Larue, and Nelson.

Eleventh Judicial Circuit. Green, Marion, Taylor, and Washington.

Twelfth Judicial Circuit. Henry, Oldham, and Trimble.

Thirteenth Judicial Circuit. Garrard and Jessamine.

Fourteenth Judicial Circuit. Bourbon, Scott, and Woodford.

Fifteenth Judicial Circuit. Carroll, Grant, and Owen.

Sixteenth Judicial Circuit. Kenton.

Seventeenth Judicial Circuit. Campbell.

Eighteenth Judicial Circuit. Harrison, Nicholas, Pendleton, and Robertson.

Nineteenth Judicial Circuit. Bracken, Fleming, and Mason.

Twentieth Judicial Circuit. Greenup and Lewis.

Twenty-first Judicial Circuit. Bath, Menifee, Montgomery, and Rowan.

Twenty-second Judicial Circuit. Fayette.

Twenty-third Judicial Circuit. Estill, Lee, and Owsley.

Twenty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Lawrence, Johnson, and Martin.

Twenty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Clark and Madison.

Twenty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Harlan.

Twenty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Knox and Laurel.

Twenty-eighth Judicial Circuit. Lincoln, Pulaski, and Rockcastle.

Twenty-ninth Judicial Circuit. Adair and Casey.

Thirtieth Judicial Circuit. Jefferson.

Thirty-first Judicial Circuit. Floyd.

Thirty-second Judicial Circuit. Boyd.

Thirty-third Judicial Circuit. Perry.

Thirty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Whitley and McCreary.

Thirty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Pike.

Thirty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Magoffin and Knott.

Thirty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Carter, Elliott, and Morgan.

Thirty-eighth Judicial Circuit. Butler, Edmonson, Ohio, and Hancock.

Thirty-ninth Judicial Circuit. Breathitt, Wolfe, and Powell.

Fortieth Judicial Circuit. Clinton, Cumberland, and Monroe.

Forty-first Judicial Circuit. Clay, Jackson, and Leslie.

Forty-second Judicial Circuit. Calloway and Marshall.

Forty-third Judicial Circuit. Barren and Metcalfe.

Forty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Bell.

Forty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Muhlenberg and McLean.

Forty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Breckinridge, Grayson, and Meade.

Forty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Letcher.

Forty-eighth Judicial Circuit. Franklin.

Forty-ninth Judicial Circuit. Allen and Simpson.

Fiftieth Judicial Circuit. Boyle and Mercer.

Fifty-first Judicial Circuit. Henderson.

Fifty-second Judicial Circuit. Graves.

Fifty-third Judicial Circuit. Shelby, Anderson, and Spencer.

Fifty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Boone and Gallatin.

Fifty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Bullitt.

Fifty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Caldwell, Livingston, Lyon, and Trigg.

Fifty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Russell and Wayne.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 476; 1992, ch. 356, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2001, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

23A.020.
Judicial circuits. [Effective January 2, 2023]

The state is divided into judicial circuits, each to be composed of the following counties:

First Judicial Circuit. Ballard, Carlisle, Fulton, and Hickman.

Second Judicial Circuit. McCracken.

Third Judicial Circuit. Christian.

Fourth Judicial Circuit. Hopkins.

Fifth Judicial Circuit. Crittenden, Union, and Webster.

Sixth Judicial Circuit. Daviess.

Seventh Judicial Circuit. Logan and Todd.

Eighth Judicial Circuit. Edmonson and Warren.

Ninth Judicial Circuit. Hardin.

Tenth Judicial Circuit. Hart, Larue, and Nelson.

Eleventh Judicial Circuit. Green, Marion, Taylor, and Washington.

Twelfth Judicial Circuit. Henry, Oldham, and Trimble.

Thirteenth Judicial Circuit. Garrard and Jessamine.

Fourteenth Judicial Circuit. Bourbon, Scott, and Woodford.

Fifteenth Judicial Circuit. Carroll, Grant, and Owen.

Sixteenth Judicial Circuit. Kenton.

Seventeenth Judicial Circuit. Campbell.

Eighteenth Judicial Circuit. Harrison, Nicholas, Pendleton, and Robertson.

Nineteenth Judicial Circuit. Bracken, Fleming, and Mason.

Twentieth Judicial Circuit. Greenup and Lewis.

Twenty-first Judicial Circuit. Bath, Menifee, Montgomery, and Rowan.

Twenty-second Judicial Circuit. Fayette.

Twenty-third Judicial Circuit. Estill, Lee, and Owsley.

Twenty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Lawrence, Johnson, and Martin.

Twenty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Clark and Madison.

Twenty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Harlan.

Twenty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Knox and Laurel.

Twenty-eighth Judicial Circuit. Lincoln, Pulaski, and Rockcastle.

Twenty-ninth Judicial Circuit. Adair and Casey.

Thirtieth Judicial Circuit. Jefferson.

Thirty-first Judicial Circuit. Floyd.

Thirty-second Judicial Circuit. Boyd.

Thirty-third Judicial Circuit. Perry.

Thirty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Whitley and McCreary.

Thirty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Pike.

Thirty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Magoffin and Knott.

Thirty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Carter, Elliott, and Morgan.

Thirty-eighth Judicial Circuit. Butler, Ohio, and Hancock.

Thirty-ninth Judicial Circuit. Breathitt, Wolfe, and Powell.

Fortieth Judicial Circuit. Clinton, Cumberland, and Monroe.

Forty-first Judicial Circuit. Clay, Jackson, and Leslie.

Forty-second Judicial Circuit. Calloway and Marshall.

Forty-third Judicial Circuit. Barren and Metcalfe.

Forty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Bell.

Forty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Muhlenberg and McLean.

Forty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Breckinridge, Grayson, and Meade.

Forty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Letcher.

Forty-eighth Judicial Circuit. Franklin.

Forty-ninth Judicial Circuit. Allen and Simpson.

Fiftieth Judicial Circuit. Boyle and Mercer.

Fifty-first Judicial Circuit. Henderson.

Fifty-second Judicial Circuit. Graves.

Fifty-third Judicial Circuit. Shelby, Anderson, and Spencer.

Fifty-fourth Judicial Circuit. Boone and Gallatin.

Fifty-fifth Judicial Circuit. Bullitt.

Fifty-sixth Judicial Circuit. Caldwell, Livingston, Lyon, and Trigg.

Fifty-seventh Judicial Circuit. Russell and Wayne.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 476; 1992, ch. 356, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2001, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2022 ch. 129, § 1, effective January 2, 2023.

23A.030.
Judicial circuits with one Circuit Judge.

Each judicial circuit shall have one (1) Circuit Judge, except as otherwise provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 477.

23A.040.
Judicial circuits with two Circuit Judges and two numbered divisions.
[Effective until January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to two (2) judges and shall have two (2) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Fourth Judicial Circuit.

Fifth Judicial Circuit.

Tenth Judicial Circuit.

Eleventh Judicial Circuit.

Twelfth Judicial Circuit.

Thirteenth Judicial Circuit.

Eighteenth Judicial Circuit.

Twentieth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-first Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-fourth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-second Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-fourth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-ninth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-first Judicial Circuit.

Forty-second Judicial Circuit.

Forty-third Judicial Circuit.

Forty-sixth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-ninth Judicial Circuit.

Fiftieth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-first Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-third Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 478; 1980, ch. 247, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 356, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 204, § 2, effective October 1, 1996; 1996, ch. 377, § 2, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 517, §§ 3, 12, effective September 1, 1998, January 1, 1999, and September 1, 1999; 2000, ch. 541, § 1, effective July 1, 2000; 2001, ch. 72, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 66, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, § Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 1, effective July 15, 2006; 2006, ch. 250, § 1, effective January 1, 2007; 2017 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 21, 2017; 2018 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/21/2017). 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 4, provides that the amendments to this statute in Section 1 of that Act apply retroactively to April 16, 2016.

(1/1/2007). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 205, Part V, sec. 6, provides that the new judgeships created by subsections (1), (16), (21) and (26) of this statute shall become effective January 1, 2007.

23A.040.
Judicial circuits with two Circuit Judges and two numbered divisions.
[Effective January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to two (2) judges and shall have two (2) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Fourth Judicial Circuit.

Fifth Judicial Circuit.

Tenth Judicial Circuit.

Eleventh Judicial Circuit.

Twelfth Judicial Circuit.

Thirteenth Judicial Circuit.

Eighteenth Judicial Circuit.

Twentieth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-first Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-fourth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-first Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-second Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-fourth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-ninth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-first Judicial Circuit.

Forty-second Judicial Circuit.

Forty-third Judicial Circuit.

Forty-sixth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-ninth Judicial Circuit.

Fiftieth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-first Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-third Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-sixth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 478; 1980, ch. 247, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 356, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 204, § 2, effective October 1, 1996; 1996, ch. 377, § 2, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 517, §§ 3, 12, effective September 1, 1998, January 1, 1999, and September 1, 1999; 2000, ch. 541, § 1, effective July 1, 2000; 2001, ch. 72, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 66, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, § Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 1, effective July 15, 2006; 2006, ch. 250, § 1, effective January 1, 2007; 2017 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 21, 2017; 2018 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 57, § 6, effective January 2, 2023; 2022 ch. 129, § 2, effective January 2, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/2/2023). Under
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 129, secs. 10 and
11, the terms of new judgeships created in the amendments to this statute begin January 2, 2023, and elections to fill the judgeships must be placed on the ballot for the regular election held in November 2022. All candidates for those judgeships who file a valid petition for nomination are to be placed on the ballot for that election.

(1/2/2023). This statute was amended by 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 57, secs. 2 and 6, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

23A.045.
Judicial circuits with three Circuit Judges and three numbered divisions.
[Effective until January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to three (3) Circuit Judges and shall have three (3) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Second Judicial Circuit.

Third Judicial Circuit.

Sixth Judicial Circuit.

Fourteenth Judicial Circuit.

Seventeenth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-first Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 517, §§ 4, 12, effective September 1, 1998 and September 1, 1999; 2000, ch. 541, § 2, effective July 1, 2000; 2003, ch. 66, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 2, effective July 15, 2006; 2006, ch. 250, § 2, effective January 1, 2007; 2017 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 21, 2017; 2018 ch. 57, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/21/2017). 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 4, provides that the amendments to this statute in Section 2 of that Act apply retroactively to April 16, 2016.

(1/1/2007). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 250, Part V, sec. 6, provides that the new judgeships created by subsections (3) and (10) of this statute shall become effective January 1, 2007.

23A.045.
Judicial circuits with three Circuit Judges and three numbered divisions.
[Effective January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to three (3) Circuit Judges and shall have three (3) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Second Judicial Circuit.

Seventeenth Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

Thirty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

Forty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 517, §§ 4, 12, effective September 1, 1998 and September 1, 1999; 2000, ch. 541, § 2, effective July 1, 2000; 2003, ch. 66, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 2, effective July 15, 2006; 2006, ch. 250, § 2, effective January 1, 2007; 2017 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 21, 2017; 2018 ch. 57, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 57, § 7, effective January 2, 2023; 2022 ch. 129, § 3, effective January 2, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/2/2023). This statute was amended by 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 57, secs. 3 and 7, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

23A.050.
Judicial circuits with four Circuit Judges and four numbered divisions. [Effective until January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to four (4) judges and shall have four (4) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Eighth Judicial Circuit.

Ninth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-fourth Judicial Circuit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 479; 2003, ch. 66, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 3, effective July 15, 2006; 2006, ch. 250, § 3, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 44, § 2, effective August 1, 2010; 2018 ch. 57, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2007). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 250, Part V, sec. 6, provides that the new judgeships created by subsection (2) of this statute shall become effective January 1, 2007.

23A.050.
Judicial circuits with four Circuit Judges and four numbered divisions. [Effective January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to four (4) judges and shall have four (4) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Third Judicial Circuit.

Sixth Judicial Circuit.

Ninth Judicial Circuit.

Fourteenth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-seventh Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-eighth Judicial Circuit.

Fifty-fourth Judicial Circuit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 479; 2003, ch. 66, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XIII, 1.(3), § 3, effective July 15, 2006; 2006, ch. 250, § 3, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 44, § 2, effective August 1, 2010; 2018 ch. 57, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 129, § 4, effective January 2, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/2/2023). Under
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 129, secs. 10 and
11, the terms of new judgeships created in the amendments to this statute begin January 2, 2023, and elections to fill the judgeships must be placed on the ballot for the regular election held in November 2022. All candidates for those judgeships who file a valid petition for nomination are to be placed on the ballot for that election.

23A.052.
Judicial circuits with five Circuit Judges and five numbered divisions. [Effective January 2, 2023]

The following judicial circuits are entitled to five (5) judges and shall have five (5) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court:

Eighth Judicial Circuit.

Twenty-fifth Judicial Circuit.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 129, § 5, effective January 2, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/2/2023). Under 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 129, secs. 10 and 11, the terms of new judgeships created in this statute begin January 2, 2023, and elections to fill the judgeships must be placed on the ballot for the regular election held in November 2022. All candidates for those judgeships who file a valid petition for nomination are to be placed on the ballot for that election.

23A.055.
Sixteenth Judicial Circuit. [Effective until January 2, 2023]

The Sixteenth Judicial Circuit is entitled to five (5) judges and shall have five (5) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 44, § 1, effective August 1, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/2/2023). Under
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 129, secs. 10 and
11, the terms of new judgeships created in the amendments to this statute begin January 2, 2023, and elections to fill the judgeships must be placed on the ballot for the regular election held in November 2022. All candidates for those judgeships who file a valid petition for nomination are to be placed on the ballot for that election.

(8/1/2010). 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 44, sec. 1, provides that the new judgeship created by this statute shall become effective August 1, 2010.

23A.055.
Sixteenth Judicial Circuit. [Effective January 2, 2023]

The Sixteenth Judicial Circuit is entitled to six (6) judges and shall have six (6) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 44, § 1, effective August 1, 2010; 2022 ch. 129, § 6, effective January 2, 2023.

23A.060.
Twenty-second Judicial Circuit.

The Twenty-second Judicial Circuit is entitled to nine (9) judges and shall have nine (9) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 480; 1996, ch. 204, § 1, effective October 1, 1996; 2003, ch. 66, § 7, effective June 24, 2003.

23A.070.
Thirtieth Judicial Circuit — Family court — Funds from previously created campaign accounts.

The Thirtieth Judicial Circuit is entitled to twenty-three (23) judges and shall have twenty-three (23) numbered divisions of the Circuit Court. The Circuit Court divisions designated for family court shall be consecutively numbered beginning with the Thirtieth Judicial Circuit, First Division, Family Court. All other Circuit Court divisions shall be consecutively numbered beginning with the Thirtieth Judicial Circuit, First Division, and shall appear on the ballot prior to the designated family court divisions. These designations shall apply for election purposes and all other purposes.

Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 121.180(10) to the contrary, a judicial candidate whose division number is altered pursuant to subsection (1) of this section subsequent to the establishment of a campaign account with the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance may expend the funds contained in the established account for election to the judicial division to which they were elected or appointed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 481; 1996, ch. 377, § 1, effective October 1, 1996; 2003, ch. 66, § 8, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 124, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

23A.080.
Appeals from District Court — Issuance of writs by Circuit Court.

A direct appeal may be taken from District Court to Circuit Court from any final action of the District Court.

The Circuit Court may issue all writs necessary in aid of its appellate jurisdiction, or the complete determination of any cause within its appellate jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 482, effective January 2, 1978.

23A.090.
Security services provided by sheriff — Compensation.

The sheriff of the county in which the Circuit Court is sitting shall provide such deputies, certified court security officers, and ordinary equipment as the Chief Circuit Judge shall deem necessary to provide security services to the court and its facilities.

The sheriff shall be compensated for these duties at rates to be determined by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 483, effective January 2, 1978; 2007, ch. 54, § 9, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The fees earned by deputies providing security services for the Circuit and District Courts are really fees of the sheriff’s office, and must go into the general official receipts of the sheriff; the sheriff may be given proper credit against his excess fees, where he takes such fees earned by the deputies and applies them on their salaries, but such fees earned by the deputies must first be turned into the regular sheriff’s account.

OAG 80-259

.

23A.100.
Jurisdiction of family court.

As a division of Circuit Court with general jurisdiction pursuant to Section 112(6) of the Constitution of Kentucky, a family court division of Circuit Court shall retain jurisdiction in the following cases:

Dissolution of marriage;

Child custody;

Visitation;

Maintenance and support;

Equitable distribution of property in dissolution cases;

Adoption; and

Termination of parental rights.

In addition to general jurisdiction of Circuit Court, a family court division of Circuit Court shall have the following additional jurisdiction:

Domestic violence and abuse proceedings under KRS Chapter 403 subsequent to the issuance of an emergency protective order in accord with local protocols under KRS

403.725

;

Proceedings under the Uniform Act on Paternity, KRS Chapter 406, and the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

;

Dependency, neglect, and abuse proceedings under KRS Chapter 620; and

Juvenile status offenses under KRS Chapter 630, except where proceedings under KRS Chapter 635 or 640 are pending.

Family court divisions of Circuit Court shall be the primary forum for cases in this section, except that nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the concurrent jurisdiction of District Court.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2003, ch. 66, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2015 ch. 102, § 38, effective January 1, 2016.

23A.110.
Additional jurisdiction of family court to be construed to promote underlying purposes.

The additional jurisdiction of a family court division of Circuit Court shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes, which are as follows:

To strengthen and preserve the integrity of the family and safeguard marital and familial relationships;

To protect children and adult family members from domestic violence and abuse;

To promote the amicable settlement of disputes that have arisen between family members;

To assure an adequate remedy for children adjudged to be dependent, abused, or neglected, and for those children adjudicated as status offenders;

To mitigate the potential harm to the spouses and their children caused by the process of legal dissolution of marriage;

To make adequate provision for the care, custody, and support of minor children of divorce and for those children who have been born out of wedlock; and

To provide a level of proceedings, when necessary, that is more appropriate to a family court division of Circuit Court.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2003, ch. 66, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

23A.120.
Position of domestic relations commissioner abolished in family court.

In any judicial circuit where a family court is established or has been established, the position of domestic relations commissioner is abolished, and no commissioner shall be appointed to hear or determine any matter within the jurisdiction of the family court.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 86, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.